Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. In General
§ 31-7-128.
Mandatory suspension of license or nonresident operating privilege for certain violations; suspension of registration.

The division shall suspend the license or nonresident operating privilege of any driver upon receiving a record of the driver’s conviction under W.S.

31-5-229

, a similar local ordinance or a similar statute or ordinance in another jurisdiction for:

Ninety (90) days, for the first conviction;

Six (6) months, if the person has been previously convicted once under W.S.

31-5-229

, a similar ordinance or a similar statute or ordinance in another jurisdiction within the five (5) year period preceding:

The date of the offense upon which the conviction is based; or

The date of conviction at issue.

Upon receiving a record of a driver’s conviction under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence, the division shall suspend the license or nonresident operating privilege for:

Ninety (90) days for the first conviction;

One (1) year, if the person has been previously convicted once under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence within the ten (10) year period preceding:

The date of the offense upon which the conviction is based; or

The date of the conviction at issue.

If a person has been convicted under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence at least once within the two (2) year period preceding the date of the most recent offense upon which a conviction under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence is based, the registration of the vehicle being driven if registered in this state to the convicted individual shall be suspended by the division for the period of the driver’s license revocation or suspension. The division shall notify the county treasurer of the vehicle registration suspension. The county treasurer, during the period of registration suspension, shall not issue any new vehicle registrations to the convicted individual. Any peace officer may confiscate the license plate of a vehicle whose registration is solely in the name of the driver whose license has been suspended or revoked under state law.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 102, § 3.

Any person whose driver’s license or nonresident operating privilege has been suspended shall, for a three (3) year period beginning on the date of suspension, file and maintain proof of financial responsibility as required in W.S.

31-9-401

through

31-9-414

. The requirement for filing and maintaining proof of financial responsibility under this subsection does not apply to a suspension under subsection (f), (g) or (n) of this section.

Upon receiving a record of the conviction of a driver who is under nineteen (19) years of age for violating any law regarding the possession, delivery, manufacture or use of a controlled substance or alcohol, the division shall suspend the license or nonresident operating privilege for:

Ninety (90) days for the first conviction;

Six (6) months, if the person has been previously convicted within the preceding twelve (12) months for violating any law regarding the possession, delivery, manufacture or use of a controlled substance or alcohol.

Upon receiving notice from the department of family services that a driver is in arrears in a child support obligation, the division shall withhold or suspend the license or any nonresident operating privileges of any driver as specified in the notice until the division receives notice from the department of family services that the driver has made full payment of his child support obligation in arrears or has entered into and is complying with a payment plan approved by the department of family services.

Upon receiving a record of a driver’s violation of W.S.

31-5-234

, the department shall suspend or deny the license or nonresident driving privileges as follows:

A person who has been issued a driver’s license shall be suspended:

For a period of ninety (90) days for a first offense;

For a period of six (6) months if the person has previously violated W.S.

31-5-234

once, or has previously been convicted once under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence within two (2) years preceding:

The date of the offense upon which the conviction is based; or

The date of conviction.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 93, § 2.

A person who has not been issued a driver’s license shall not operate a vehicle and the department shall not issue the person a driver’s license or learner’s permit for the time specified in paragraph (h)(i) of this section.

The provisions of subsection (e) of this section do not apply to a denial or suspension under W.S.

31-5-234

if the denial or suspension is based solely on a violation of W.S.

31-5-234

.

Records of convictions or license suspensions under subsection (h) of this section shall not be made a part of the abstracts or records kept by the department of transportation pursuant to W.S.

31-5-1214

or

31-7-120

. Any records maintained by the department for suspensions under subsection (h) of this section shall be maintained separately and shall not be available for public inspection except for inspection by any law enforcement officer or agency to enforce the laws of Wyoming. Records under this subsection shall be maintained so that, upon inquiry by any member of the public who is not otherwise entitled to inspect a record maintained under this subsection, the records relating to the subject of the inquiry shall not display information with respect to a license suspension under subsection (h) of this section. Any driver’s license suspension or related records under subsection (h) of this section shall not be the basis for any increase in insurance premiums or the cancellation of any insurance policy for a person or his parents affected by subsection (h) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (k) of this section, the department shall expunge the record relating to the suspension of a driver’s license under subsection (h) of this section when the person under suspension attains twenty-one (21) years of age, unless the person’s driver’s license is under suspension at that time, in which case the record shall be expunged when the suspension terminates and the person has paid the reinstatement fee required under W.S. 31-7-113(e).

The division shall suspend the license or nonresident operating privilege of any driver upon receiving a record of the driver’s second or subsequent conviction under W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to motor vehicle fuel offered for retail sale, a similar local ordinance or a similar statute or ordinance in another jurisdiction for:

Thirty (30) days, for the second conviction;

Ninety (90) days for the third and each subsequent conviction.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.26; Rev. W.S. 1957, 31-276.26; Laws 1977, ch. 111, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-127

; Laws 1982, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 41, § 3; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1990, ch. 92, § 1; 1991, ch. 233, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 1998, ch. 102, § 2; 1999, ch. 48, § 1; 2000, ch. 53, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 68, § 1; 2010, ch. 5, § 1; 2013 ch. 102, § 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to theft of fuel, see § 6-3-402(f).

As to ignition interlock licenses, see §

31-7-401

et seq.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (n); and updated the internal references in (e).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “ten (10) year” for “five (5) year” in the introductory language of (b)(ii).

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 102, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (d), which read: “The division shall suspend the license or any nonresident operating privileges of any person failing to report an accident as required by W.S.

31-5-1106

through

31-5-1108

until the report has been filed.”

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “W.S.

6-3-412

” for “W.S. 6-3-402(f)” in (n).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (n) substituted “W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to motor vehicle fuel offered for retail sale” for “W.S.

6-3-412

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Double jeopardy. —

Driver's license suspensions under §

31-6-102

do not constitute punishment for purposes of double jeopardy, but are civil proceedings, separate and distinct from prosecutions for driving while under the influence. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

License suspension of under-19 individuals unconstitutional. —

Section

31-7-126

and subsection (f) of this section, which provide for the driver's license suspension of individuals under 19 years of age convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, represent constitutionally prohibited special legislation that lacks rational differentiation from persons aged 19 and 20 who are also denied the right to use alcoholic beverages constituting a similar class and, for that matter, those of any age whose excessive use makes their use illegal. (Decided prior to 2005 amendment to §

31-7-126

). Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Section

31-7-126

and subsection (f) of this section, which provide for the suspension of driver's license for individuals less than 19 years of age when convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, constitute punishment for a previous conviction, in violation of the prohibition of double jeopardy under art. 1, § 11, Wyo. Const. (Decided prior to 2005 amendment to §

31-7-126

). Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Former provisions improperly delegated legislative powers to executive department. —

See Eastwood v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, 76 Wyo. 247, 301 P.2d 818,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1956).

Section is not unconstitutional delegation of authority

from the legislature to the executive department. State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983).

Unrebutted record of moving violations may amount to habitually reckless or negligent driving. —

The unrebutted record of moving violations may in and of itself amount to habitually reckless or negligent driving within the contemplation of the statutes, rules and regulations, and case law. State Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Guadagnoli, 677 P.2d 823,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1984).

When traffic citation procedure utilized, accused to be informed of nature of offense. —

When the uniform citation procedure is utilized relative to a license suspension, it is sufficient if the accused is informed of the nature of the offense with which he is charged, as there is no authority holding that due process requires a uniform traffic citation to set out the penalty which will follow in the event of a conviction. Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Shipley, 579 P.2d 415,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1978).

Liberal construction of notice provision in suspension procedures. —

Applicable statutes and rules should be liberally construed in favor of the right of a licensee to have a review of a proposed suspension, so that the phrase “date of notice” — contained in § 13 of the Rules of the Department of Revenue and Taxation — from which the time to request a hearing is computed, should be construed to mean the date of actual receipt by the licensee of the suspension order, rather than the date of the order or the date of its mailing. Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Shipley, 579 P.2d 415,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1978).

Division suspends or revokes licenses, not court. —

Drivers' licenses are not suspended at the time of conviction for driving while intoxicated by operation of law. The licenses are suspended or revoked by the division. The principal objective of involving the courts in the suspension and revocation procedure is to obtain immediate surrender of the license, but the division is intended to perform the function of suspension or revocation. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983) (decided prior to 1984 amendment of §

31-5-233

).

Division not subject to restrictions on courts in considering prior convictions. —

The division can suspend or revoke drivers' licenses on the basis of prior convictions for driving while intoxicated other than those considered by the courts in imposing sentence. The courts can only consider those prior convictions referred to in the complaint or information upon which the defendant is charged. Historically, the division has not been subject to the same restrictions as have the courts with reference to enhanced penalties under a habitual criminal act, such as in §

31-5-233

.State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

But only convictions under §

31-5-233

can be counted as prior convictions. —

Neither the division nor the courts can consider prior convictions for driving while intoxicated under the laws of other states or under municipal ordinances of this state in connection with sentences or with suspension or revocation of drivers' licenses. Only convictions under §

31-5-233

can be counted as prior convictions for enhancement of sentences or for suspension and revocation of drivers' licenses. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983) (decided prior to 1984 and 1985 amendments).

The refusal of the division to restore driving privileges which were suspended based on convictions under municipal ordinances was properly overturned by the district court, in actions filed subsequent to the decision in State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983), which declared such suspensions unlawful. State v. Kraus, 706 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 573

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to 1984 and 1985 amendments).

Foreign conviction applied. —

Where Wyoming government agency's computer printout of electronically filed contents of defendant's driving record was sufficient to authenticate a motor vehicle conviction from a foreign jurisdiction under §

31-7-201

, the conviction was used under this section. McDonald v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 846 P.2d 694,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1993).

Subsection (b) does not allow for exercise of discretion.

Agency action is mandated. McGuire v. State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 809 P.2d 271,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1991).

Suspension powers extend to hearing examiner and tax commission. —

The provisions of subsection (c) were specific with respect to the authority of the division, upon hearing, to continue, modify or extend the suspension of a driver's license, and that authority extended to the hearing examiner, as its agent, and to the Wyoming tax commission, as one of its departments. Department of Revenue & Taxation, Motor Vehicle Div. v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983) (decided prior to 1984 and 1985 amendments).

Authority of BIA agents to compel suspension. —

Under the Wyoming Statutes, Bureau of Indian Affairs agents have the authority to compel the surrender or suspension of a person's Wyoming driver's license. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Criminal conviction not subject to collateral attack. —

A motorist could not, in an administrative hearing on an order suspending his driving privileges, collaterally attack his criminal conviction for driving under the influence, which conviction was the basis for the suspension. Meyer v. State, 767 P.2d 617,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, application and effect of statute requiring conditions, in addition to expiration of time, for reinstatement of suspended or revoked driver's license 2 ALR5th 725.

Automobiles: necessity or emergency as defense in prosecution for driving without operator's license or while license is suspended, 7 ALR5th 73.

§ 31-7-129.
Discretionary suspension of license.

The division may suspend the license of any driver for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months if the licensee:

Is a repeated violator, such fact being established by a record of moving violations, accidents or by other evidence;

Has permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of his license as defined in W.S.

31-7-133

;

Has refused or neglected to submit to an examination required by the division under W.S.

31-7-122

;

Has violated his promise to appear in court, given to an arresting officer in this state or any other state upon the issuance of a traffic citation, or has failed to appear in court in this state or another state at the time specified by the court; or

Violates any of the endorsements on his commercial driver’s license.

Upon receiving a record of the licensee’s conviction, the division may suspend a license issued under W.S. 31-7-117(c) for:

Ninety (90) days, for a first conviction;

One (1) year, for a subsequent conviction.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.26; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.26; Laws 1977, ch. 111, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-127

; Laws 1982, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 41, § 3; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 33, § 2; 1989, ch. 176, § 2; 2011, ch. 167, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iv), deleted “written” preceding “promise.”

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

§ 31-7-130.
Commencement of cancellation, suspension or revocation.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a cancellation, suspension or revocation by the division under this act or any other law shall commence the later of:

Twenty (20) days after notice of intent to suspend or revoke is given by the division;

If a hearing is requested in a timely manner, at the conclusion of the hearing process; or

If the person’s license or privilege to drive was suspended or revoked at the time an additional suspension or revocation would have commenced under paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section or other law, on the date that prior suspension or revocation expires.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see
§
31-7-102(a)(xlix).

§ 31-7-131.
Surrender and return of license.

Upon cancelling, suspending or revoking a license, the division shall require that any physical license be surrendered to the division and that any digital driver’s license be cancelled or suspended.

Any person whose license has been cancelled, suspended or revoked shall immediately return his physical license to the division.

At the end of a period of a suspension, the division shall return a license to the licensee, if unexpired, and revalidate any digital driver’s license, if applicable.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 31-275.29, 31-275.30; Rev. W.S. 1957, §§ 31-276.29, 31-276.30; W.S. 1977, §§ 31-7-130(b),

31-7-131

; Laws 1984, ch. 41, § 3; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), substituted “any physical” for “the” preceding “license be surrendered” and added “and that any digital driver’s license be cancelled or suspended” at the end; in (b), added “physical” preceding “license to the division”; and in (c), added “and revalidate any digital driver’s license, if applicable” at the end.

§ 31-7-132.
Restriction on operation under foreign license during cancellation, suspension or revocation in this state.

Any resident or nonresident whose driver’s license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle in this state has been cancelled, suspended or revoked under this act, shall not drive a motor vehicle in this state under a license or permit issued by any other jurisdiction during the suspension or after cancellation or revocation until a new license is obtained or nonresident operating privileges are authorized under this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.31; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.31; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Resident with revoked license cannot drive on nonresident permit. —

A Wyoming resident whose Wyoming driver's license was revoked could not legally drive in Wyoming on a nonresident Colorado operator's temporary permit. Ayres v. State, 718 P.2d 905,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 548

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 31-7-133.
Unlawful use of license.

It is an unlawful use of a license and is a misdemeanor for any person to:

Display or permit to be displayed, or have in his possession any cancelled, revoked, suspended, fictitious or fraudulently altered driver’s license;

Lend his driver’s license to any other person or knowingly permit its use by another;

Display or represent as one’s own any driver’s license not issued to him;

Fail or refuse to surrender to the department upon lawful demand any driver’s license which has been suspended, revoked or cancelled;

Use a false or fictitious name in any application for a driver’s license, knowingly make a false statement, knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in any application;

Permit any unlawful use of a driver’s license issued to him; or

Drive a vehicle in violation of the endorsements on his driver’s license, commercial driver’s license or commercial learners, instruction or temporary permit.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.33; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.33; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-134

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 176, § 2; 2013 ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “commercial driver’s license or commercial learners” for “or” in (a)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “minor traffic infraction” excludible from calculation of defendant's criminal history under United States Sentencing Guideline § 4A1.2(c)(2), 113 ALR Fed 561.

§ 31-7-134.
Driving while license cancelled, suspended or revoked.

No person shall drive a motor vehicle on any public highway in this state at a time when his driver’s license, from this or any other jurisdiction, or nonresident operating privileges are cancelled, suspended or revoked under this act or any other law. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person convicted of violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 113, § 2.

A person convicted of a subsequent violation of subsection (a) of this section or other substantially similar law of any other jurisdiction for driving during the same period of cancellation, suspension or revocation giving rise to the previous conviction, or a person convicted of driving during a period of cancellation, suspension or revocation arising from a previous conviction under W.S.

31-5-229

or

31-5-233

or other substantially similar law of any other jurisdiction, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not less than seven (7) days nor more than six (6) months and shall not be eligible for probation or suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until he has served at least seven (7) days in jail. In addition, the person shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years convicted of being in control of a vehicle in this state with an alcohol concentration of between two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) and the amount specified in W.S.

31-5-233

(b)(i) shall not be punished by imprisonment of at least seven (7) days in jail as otherwise provided under this section, but shall have his license administratively suspended for thirty (30) days.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years convicted of being in control of a vehicle in this state with an alcohol concentration of between two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) and the amount specified in W.S. 31-5-233(b)(i) shall not be punished by imprisonment of at least seven (7) days in jail as otherwise provided by this section, but shall have his license administratively suspended for thirty (30) days.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.34; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.34; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-135

; Laws 1982, ch. 42, § 1; 1985, ch. 107, § 1; ch. 234, § 2; 1998, ch. 102, § 2; ch. 113, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 1; 2022 ch. 80, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or other substantially similar law of any other jurisdiction” twice in the first sentence of (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Resident with revoked license cannot drive with nonresident permit. —

A Wyoming resident whose Wyoming driver's license was revoked could not legally drive in Wyoming on a nonresident Colorado operator's temporary permit. Ayres v. State, 718 P.2d 905,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 548

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Pool v. State, 2001 WY 8, 17 P.3d 1285,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Automobiles: necessity or emergency as defense in prosecution for driving without operator's license or while license is suspended, 7 ALR5th 73.

§ 31-7-135.
Permitting unlicensed person to drive.

No person shall authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by him or under his control to be driven or towed upon any highway by any person who is not licensed for the type or class of vehicles to be driven or is in violation of any provision of this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.36; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.36; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-137

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Automobile dealer not liable for entrusting car to unlicensed, but capable, minor. —

An automobile dealer who entrusts a car to a minor for a tryout is not liable for the minor's negligence merely because the minor does not have a driver's license, where the minor is of man size, of good appearance, employed in a man's work, and capable of driving the car in town traffic and on the highway. Finch v. Canaday, 75 Wyo. 472, 297 P.2d 594,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1956) (decided under prior law).

Homeowner's insurer had no duty to defend. —

Homeowner's insurer did not owe a duty to defend a claim against its insured in which it was claimed that the insured's act of giving her unlicensed daughter gas money was an independent act of negligence (an “occurrence”); the insured's act or acts were inextricably related to the operation of the motor vehicle and, hence, fell squarely within an exclusion to the insurance coverage at issue. Lawrence v. State Farm Fire & Cas. Co., 2006 WY 56, 133 P.3d 976,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction, application and effect of legislation making it offense to permit unauthorized or unlicensed person to operate motor vehicle, 69 ALR2d 978.

Negligent entrustment of motor vehicle to unlicensed driver, 55 ALR4th 1100.

§ 31-7-136.
General penalties.

Except as otherwise provided by this act, any person who violates any provision of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.37; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.37; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-138

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2020 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, deleted “by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both. On conviction for a second or subsequent violation, the person may be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not to exceed six (6) months, or both” at the end and made a stylistic change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in the first sentence, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “minor traffic infraction” excludible from calculation of defendant's criminal history under United States Sentencing Guideline § 4A1.2(c)(2), 113 ALR Fed 561.

§ 31-7-137.
Proof of receipt of notice or order; change of address or name.

Evidence that a notice or order from the division under this act was mailed to the last known address of a person is prima facie proof the person received the notice or order five (5) days after the notice or order was mailed. Evidence that a notice or order from the division was sent by electronic means to the person’s last known address, if the person has consented to receive notices electronically, is prima facie proof that the person received the notice or order one (1) day after the notice or order was sent electronically.

A person licensed under this act shall notify the division in writing within ten (10) days of any change of his address or name. Notification to the division may be by electronic means if the division has made electronic notification available and if the person opts to use electronic means. The division shall maintain a record of the names and addresses of all persons licensed under this act and shall amend the record when notified under this subsection.

When a licensee changes his name, mailing address or residence, an application for a duplicate license shall be made within ten (10) days of the date of the change.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1993, ch. 145, § 2; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), substituted “Evidence that a notice or order from the division was sent by electronic means to the person’s last known address, if the person has consented to receive notices electronically, is prima facie proof that the person received the notice or order one (1) day after the notice or order was sent electronically” for “As used in this section, ‘last known address’ means the address on file with the division” at the end; and in (b) added the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

§ 31-7-138.
Temporary license pursuant to W.S. 31-5-1205(k) (arrest for driving under the influence).

The division shall provide to law enforcement agencies in this state temporary driver’s license forms to be issued pursuant to W.S. 31-5-1205(k). The temporary license form shall be prescribed by the division, be completed by the issuing officer, be valid for thirty (30) days and shall specify:

The date of issuance;

That the license is valid for thirty (30) days;

That the person may apply for an extension from the division, if eligible for a Wyoming driver’s license;

That the person’s license, whether a Wyoming license or a license from another jurisdiction was or was not surrendered to the arresting officer;

That the license is not valid if at the time of issuance, the person does not have a valid driver’s license authorizing the person to drive in this state.

The division shall issue or renew a temporary license, without charge, to a licensee issued a temporary license under W.S. 31-5-1205(k) on a form prescribed by the division as valid for sixty (60) days if the licensee:

Applies in person at a licensing station;

Surrenders or has surrendered his Wyoming driver’s license;

Surrenders the temporary license issued under W.S. 31-5-1205(k); and

Is otherwise eligible to receive a Wyoming driver’s license.

The time limitations for renewal of a valid Wyoming license are extended during the time a person has a valid temporary license under this section.

The Wyoming driver’s license of any person provided a temporary license under W.S. 31-5-1205(k) is invalid until disposition of the arrest or citation and shall be surrendered to the division.

Upon receipt of a record indicating the disposition of the arrest or citation which required surrender of the license:

Each Wyoming license surrendered under this section or pursuant to W.S. 31-5-1205(k) shall be:

Returned, if the licensee is not convicted and is otherwise entitled to receive the license; or

Retained, if the licensee is convicted.

Otherwise, each record received shall be forwarded to the jurisdiction in which the license was issued and shall indicate:

The licensee was not convicted and is otherwise entitled to receive his license or driving privileges; or

The licensee was convicted.

The division shall upon receipt of out-of-state driver’s license from the arresting officer under W.S. 31-5-1205(k) and 31-6-104(b) return the license to the jurisdiction in which it was issued along with a copy of the temporary driver’s license issued to licensee. The licensee is responsible for contacting the jurisdiction in which the license was issued for securing its return.

As used in subsection (e) of this section:

“Convicted” includes the department’s suspension or denial of a license pursuant to W.S.

31-5-234

or

31-6-108

;

“Otherwise entitled to receive the license” means the license is not currently under any suspension, revocation or cancellation for any reason, including suspension under W.S.

31-6-102

or

31-6-107

as a result of the same incident on which an arrest or citation was based.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 41, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-139

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 131, § 1; 1998, ch. 102, § 2; 2000, ch. 70, § 1.

Return of license following acquittal. —

By cross-referencing statutory provisions, legislature intended that suspended driver was “otherwise entitled” to have her license returned to her once she was acquitted of criminal charge, unless there was a reason, other than suspension itself, to retain the license. Wyoming DOT v. Haglund, 982 P.2d 699,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

§ 31-7-139.
Anatomical organ donor.

The department shall, at the applicant’s request, identify on the Wyoming driver’s license or identification card that the person is an anatomical organ donor as provided by W.S.

35-5-205

.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 18, § 3.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1990, ch. 18, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 79, § 2; 2009, ch. 97, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “35-5-205” for “35-5-112” in (a).

§ 31-7-140.
Nonresident Violator Compact of 1977; division to enter into compact.

The division shall execute all documents and perform other duties as necessary to enter into and carry out the provisions of the Nonresident Violator Compact of 1977.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 33, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “and shall report to the legislature after two (2) years on revenue changes in the collection of fines from nonresident violators” at the end.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Nonresident Violator Compact of 1977. —

The Nonresident Violator Compact of 1977, referred to in this section, apparently means §

31-7-201

.

§ 31-7-141.
Veteran designation.

Upon receiving the certification required by W.S. 31-7-111(b)(xii), the department shall identify on the Wyoming driver’s license or identification card that the person is an honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States. The identification shall be in the form of a “V” printed on the face of the driver’s license or identification card.

History.

2013 ch. 199, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 199, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

§ 31-7-142.
Medical alert designation.

The department shall, at the applicant’s request, identify on the Wyoming driver’s license or identification card that the person has a medical condition for which the person is requesting a medical alert designation.

Any person, official, institution or agency participating in good faith in any act required or permitted by W.S.

31-7-115

,

31-7-142

and

31-8-101

is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise result by reason of the action. For purposes of any civil or criminal proceeding, the good faith of any person, official, institution or agency participating in any act permitted or required by W.S.

31-7-115

,

31-7-142

and

31-8-101

shall be presumed.

History.

2019 ch. 139, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 139, § 3, makes the act effective January 1, 2020.